zh-CN: 高尔夫球皮材料: 混合材料; 离子聚合物; 沙林; 聚氨酯; 其他
fi: Golfpallon kuorimateriaali: Hybridi; Ionomeri; Surlyn; Uretaani; Muu
ko: 골프공 커버 소재: 하이브리드; 아이오노머; 설린; 우레탄; 기타
th: วัสดุหุ้มลูกกอล์ฟ: ไฮบริด; ไอโอโนเมอร์; เซอร์ลีน; ยูรีเทน; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau de l’enveloppe de la balle de golf: Hybride; Ionomère; Surlyn; Uréthane; Autre
de: Material der Golfballhülle: Hybrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Urethan; Andere
cs: Materiál pláště golfového míčku: Hybrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Uretan; Ostatní
bg-BG: Материал за покриване на топката за голф: Хибриден; Йономер; Surlyn; Уретан; Друго
el: Υλικό εξωτερικού περιβλήματος μπάλας γκολφ: Υβριδικό; Ιονομερές; Surlyn; Ουρεθάνη; Άλλο
pl: Materiał powłoki piłki golfowej: Hybrydowy; Jonomer; Surlyn; Uretan; Inny
es: Material de la cubierta de la pelota de golf: Híbrido; Ionómero; Surlyn; Uretano; Otro
tr: Golf topu kaplama malzemesi: Hibrit; İyonomer; Surlyn; Üretan; Diğer
sk-SK: Materiál obalu golfovej loptičky: Hybrid; Ionomér; Surlyn; Uretán; Iné
pt-BR: Bola de golfe material da cobertura: Híbrido; Ionômero; Surlyn; Uretano; Outro
vi: Chất liệu vỏ bóng golf: Lai; Ionomer; Surlyn; Urethane; Khác
pt-PT: material para cobertura de bolas de golfe: Híbrido; Ionómero; Surlyn; Uretano; Outro
it: Materiale di copertura per palline da golf: Ibrido; Ionomero; Surlyn; Uretano; Altro
nl: Golfbal buitenlaagmateriaal: Hybride; Ionomeer; Surlyn; Urethaan; Anders
ro-RO: Material pentru acoperirea mingii de golf: Hibrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Uretan; Altele
nb: Materiale for golfballdeksel: Hybrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Uretan; Annet
sv: Material för golfbollens ytterhölje: Hybrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Uretan; Annat
zh-TW: 高爾夫球外皮材質: 混合材質; 離子聚合物; 沙林樹脂; 聚氨酯; 其他
ja: ゴルフボールカバー素材: ハイブリッド; アイオノマー; サーリン; ウレタン; その他
sl-SI: Material vrhnjega sloja žogice za golf: Hibrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Uretan; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal za navlaku loptice za golf: Hibridni; Ionomer; Surlyn; Uretan; Ostalo
en: Golf ball cover material: Hybrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Urethane; Other
lt-LT: Golfo kamuoliuko dangos medžiaga: Hibridinė; Jonomeras; „Surlyn“; Uretanas; Kita
da: Materiale i golfboldens yderste skal: Hybrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Urethan; Andet
hu: Golflabda borító anyaga: Hibrid; Ionomer; Surlyn; Uretán; Egyéb
ru: Материал покрытия мяча для гольфа: Гибридный; Иономер; Сурлин; Уретан; Другое